Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7180.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 6 of the General Laws entitled "COMMERCIAL LAW — GENERAL
REGULATORY PROVISIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 63
DIGITAL ELECTRONICS RIGHT TO REPAIR ACT
6-63-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Digital Electronics Right to Repair
Act."
6-63-2. Requirements.
(a) For digital electronic equipment and parts for such equipment that are sold or used in
this state, an original equipment manufacturer shall make available to any independent repair
provider and owner of digital electronic equipment manufactured by, on behalf of, or sold by such
original equipment manufacturer, on fair and reasonable terms, any documentation, parts, and tools,
required for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of such digital electronic equipment and parts for
this equipment, inclusive of any updates. The documentation, parts and tools shall be made
available either directly, by such original equipment manufacturer or via an authorized repair
provider or distributor.
(b) An original equipment manufacturer shall not use parts pairing or any other mechanism
to:

(1) Prevent the installation or functioning of any otherwise-functional part, including a
non-manufacturer approved replacement part or component;
(2) Inhibit or reduce the functioning of any part, such that replacement by an independent
repair provider or the device owner, would cause the device to operate with reduced functionality
or performance;
(3) Create false, misleading, deceptive, or non-dismissible alerts or warnings about parts;
(4) Charge additional fees or increased prices for future repairs; or
(5) Limit who can purchase parts or perform repair services.
(c) For equipment that requires deactivating a lock for purposes of repair, the original
equipment manufacturer shall make available to any owner, or independent repair provider, with
the express permission of the owner, on fair and reasonable terms, any special documentation, tools,
and parts needed to access and reset the lock or function, when disabled in the course of diagnosis,
maintenance, or repair of such equipment. This documentation, tools, and parts may be made
available through an appropriate secure release system.
6-63-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Authorized repair provider" means an individual or business who has an arrangement
with the original equipment manufacturer under which the original equipment manufacturer, grants
to the individual or business a license to use a tradename, service mark, or other proprietary
identifiers for the purposes of offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital
electronic equipment, under the name of the original equipment manufacturer, or other arrangement
with the original equipment manufacturer, to offer such services on behalf of, or under contract to,
the original equipment manufacturer. An original equipment manufacturer who offers the services
of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of its own digital electronic equipment, shall be considered an
authorized repair provider with respect to this equipment.
(2) "Digital electronic equipment" or "equipment" means any product that depends for its
functioning, in whole or in part, on digital electronics embedded in or attached to the product.
(3) "Documentation" means any manual, maintenance procedures, functional and wiring
diagrams, reporting output, service code description, circuit board schematics, security code,
password, training material, troubleshooting information, list of required tools, parts list, or other
guidance or information used in effecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital
electronic equipment.
(4) "Embedded software" means any programmable software instructions delivered with
or loaded onto equipment, or a part of this equipment, to allow the equipment or part to operate or
LC004208 - Page 2 of 6

communicate with other computer hardware. Embedded software includes all relevant patches and
fixes, that the manufacturer makes for purposes of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of equipment.
(5) "Independent repair provider" means an individual or business operating in the state,
that does not have an arrangement described in subsection (1) of this section with, an original
equipment manufacturer, and who is engaged in the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair
of digital electronic equipment.
(6) "On fair and reasonable terms" means all of the following:
(i) At costs and terms, that are equivalent to the most favorable costs and terms under which
an original equipment manufacturer offers to an authorized repair provider, accounting for any
discount, rebate, convenient and timely means of delivery, means of enabling fully restored and
updated functionality, rights of use, or other incentive and preference the original manufacturer
offers to an authorized repair provider, or any additional cost, burden, or impediment the original
equipment manufacturer imposes on an owner or independent repair provider.
(ii) With respect to documentation, made available by the original equipment manufacturer
at no charge, except that, when the documentation is requested in physical printed form, a charge
may be included for the reasonable actual costs of preparing and sending the copy.
(iii) With respect to tools, made available by the original equipment manufacturer:
(A) At no charge, except that, when a tool is requested in physical form, a charge may be
included for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the tool;
(B) Without requiring authorization or Internet access, for the use or operation of these
tools, or imposing impediments to access or use of the tools to diagnose, maintain, or repair and
enable full functionality of digital electronic equipment; and
(C) Not in a manner that impairs the efficient and cost-effective performance of any
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair.
(iv) With respect to parts, made available by the original equipment manufacturer, either
directly or through an authorized repair provider, in a manner that:
(A) Is not conditioned on or imposing a substantial obligation or restriction including, but
not limited to, a minimum or reasonable maximum quantity of parts that owners and independent
repair providers can purchase, that is not reasonably necessary, for enabling the owner or
independent repair provider to engage in the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital electronic
equipment made by or on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer; and
(B) Does not condition access to parts on any additional contract, other than a purchase
order.
(7) "Original equipment manufacturer" or "manufacturer" means a business engaged in the
LC004208 - Page 3 of 6

business of selling, leasing, or otherwise supplying new digital electronic equipment manufactured
by or on behalf of itself, to any individual or business.
(8) "Owner" means an individual or business, who owns or leases digital electronic
equipment purchased or used in this state.
(9) "Part" means any replacement part, either new or used, made available by an original
equipment manufacturer for purposes of effecting the service, maintenance or repair of electronics-
enabled equipment manufactured by or on behalf of, sold or otherwise supplied by the original
equipment manufacturers, implemented by or with surrogate distributors.
(10) "Parts pairing" refers to the practice by manufacturers of using software to identify
component parts through a unique identifier.
(11) "Surrogate distributor" means any independent dealership, wholesale distributor,
and/or any retail establishment dealing in electronic equipment.
(12) "Tool" means any software program, hardware implement, or other apparatus used for
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital electronic equipment, including software or other
mechanisms that provision, program, or pair a new part, calibrate functionality, or perform any
other function, required to bring the product back to fully functional condition, including any
updates.
(13) "Trade secret" has the meaning as defined in § 6-41-1.
6-63-4. Enforcement by attorney general.
If the attorney general determines that a failure to provide documentation, parts, or tools as
described in § 6-63-2 constitutes an unfair method of competition, false advertising, or unfair or
deceptive trade practices under chapter 13.1 of title 6, all remedies, penalties, and authority granted
to the attorney general by that chapter, shall be available to the attorney general, for the enforcement
of this chapter.
6-63-5. Limitations.
(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an original equipment manufacturer
to divulge any trade secret to any owner or independent service provider, except as necessary to
perform diagnosis, maintenance, or repair on fair and reasonable terms.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter the terms of any arrangement
described in § 6-63-2(a), in force between an authorized repair provider and an original equipment
manufacturer including, but not limited to, the performance or provision of warranty or recall repair
work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an original equipment manufacturer and
pursuant to such arrangement, except that any provision in such terms that purports to waive, avoid,
restrict or limit the original equipment manufacturer's obligations to comply with this chapter, shall
LC004208 - Page 4 of 6

be void and unenforceable.
(c) No original equipment manufacturer or authorized repair provider shall be liable for
any damage or injury to any digital electronic equipment caused by an independent repair provider
or owner, which occurs during the course of repair, diagnosis, or maintenance and is not attributable
to the original equipment manufacturer or authorized repair provider, other than if the failure is
attributable to design or manufacturing defects.
(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a manufacturer to make available
special documentation, tools, and parts that would disable or override anti-theft security measures
set by the owner of the product, without the owner's authorization.
(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a manufacturer to sell a part, if the
part is no longer available to the manufacturer.
6-63-6. Applicability.
This chapter applies to equipment sold on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004208
========
LC004208 - Page 5 of 6